Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-218
Civil organizations; not eligible for enlistment.

No civil organization, society, club, post, order, fraternity, association, brotherhood, body, union, league, or other combination of persons or civil group, shall be enlisted in such forces as an organization or unit.

Laws 1941, c. 116, § 8, p. 449;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 55-408;

R.S.1943, § 55-218.